Utah statutes.
16-4-309.   Extension of time specified in notices.

(1)  The dates fixed in any notice of assessment or notice of sale may be extended for up to six months by order of the board of directors entered on the corporation's records.

(2)  No order extending the time for the performance of any act specified in any notice under this chapter is effective unless notice of the extension is published and served in the same manner as the original notice.



Enacted by Chapter 367, 2007 General Session

